Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-111 Effect of acceptance of
appointment. By accepting appointment, a guardian or conservator submits
personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding relating to the
guardianship or conservatorship. The petitioner shall send or deliver notice
of any proceeding to the guardian or conservator at the guardian's or
conservator's address shown in the court records and at any other address then
known to the petitioner. [L 2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next